Utah statutes.
16-6a-1511.   Service on foreign nonprofit corporation.

(1)  The registered agent of a foreign nonprofit corporation authorized to conduct affairs in this state is the foreign corporation's agent for service of process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served on the foreign nonprofit corporation.

(2) (a)  If a foreign nonprofit corporation authorized to conduct affairs in this state has no registered agent or if the registered agent cannot with reasonable diligence be served, the foreign nonprofit corporation may be served by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, addressed to the foreign nonprofit corporation at its principal office.

(b)  Service is perfected under this Subsection (2) at the earliest of:

(i)  the date the foreign nonprofit corporation receives the process, notice, or demand;

(ii)  the date shown on the return receipt, if signed on behalf of the foreign nonprofit corporation; or

(iii)  five days after mailing.

(3)  This section does not prescribe the only means, or necessarily the required means, of serving a foreign nonprofit corporation authorized to conduct affairs in this state.



Enacted by Chapter 300, 2000 General Session

